District of Columbia statutes.
10-128

When authorization by Congress needed for building.

On and after August 24, 1912, there shall not be erected on any reservation, park, or public grounds, of the United States within the District of Columbia, any building or structure without express authority of Congress.

Aug. 24, 1912, 37 Stat. 444, ch. 355, § 1
1973 Ed., § 8-133.
1981 Ed., § 8-128.
This section is referenced in § 10-1404, § 47-398.01, and § 47-398.02.